Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3810
(UTC 110) Others treated as qualified beneficiaries.

(UTC 110) (a) Whenever notice to qualified beneficiaries of a trust is required under the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code, the trustee must also give notice to any other beneficiary who has sent the trustee a request for notice.

(b) A charitable organization expressly designated to receive distributions under the terms of a charitable trust has the rights of a qualified beneficiary under the code if the charitable organization, on the date the charitable organization's qualification is being determined:

(1) is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal;

(2) would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal upon the termination of the interests of other distributees or permissible distributees then receiving or eligible to receive distributions; or

(3) would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the trust terminated on that date.

(c) A person appointed to enforce a trust created for the care of an animal or another noncharitable purpose as provided in section 30-3834 or 30-3835 has the rights of a qualified beneficiary under the code.

(d) The Attorney General has the rights of a qualified beneficiary with respect to a charitable trust having its principal place of administration in this state.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 10;

Laws 2005, LB 533, § 38.